Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1307
Sections; supplementary.

The provisions of sections 15-1301 to 15-1307 are supplementary to existing laws relating to cities of the primary class and confer upon such cities powers not heretofore granted.

Laws 1974, LB 825, § 7.